Utah statutes.
76-10-112.   Prohibition of distribution of cigarettes or other tobacco products -- Exceptions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), it is unlawful for a manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer to give or distribute cigarettes or other tobacco products in this state without charge.  Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class C misdemeanor for the first offense and a class B misdemeanor for any subsequent offense.

(2)  Cigarettes and other tobacco products may be distributed to adults without charge at professional conventions where the general public is excluded.

(3)  The prohibition described in Subsection (1) does not apply to retailers, manufacturers, or distributors who give cigarettes or other tobacco products to persons of legal age upon their purchase of cigarettes or other tobacco products.



Enacted by Chapter 193, 1989 General Session

